Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 4. Film and Video Promotion

Legislative intent. —

Laws 2008, ch. 6, § 3, provides:

“(a) It is the intention and direction of the legislature that:

“(i) All duties of the business council with respect to the Wyoming film industry financial incentive program be transferred to the Wyoming tourism board. All duties of the business council with respect to the Wyoming film industry financial incentive program not assumed by the tourism board are terminated;

“(ii) All unexpended funds not otherwise obligated and any other property, if any, of the business council exclusively dedicated to the Wyoming film industry financial incentive program be transferred to the tourism board;

“(iii) Any contract, agreement or obligation entered into or assumed by the business council with respect to the Wyoming film industry financial incentive program, if the execution or assumption was within the lawful powers of the business council, be assumed by the tourism board;

“(iv) Any policy adopted by the business council with respect to the Wyoming film industry financial incentive program remain in effect unaltered as policy of the tourism board until amended or repealed by the tourism board.”

§ 9-12-401.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 8, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1997, ch. 103, § 1, related to the Wyoming film and video reward account.

§§ 9-12-402 through 9-12-406.
Film industry financial incentive program; creation; account. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 73, § 1; 2008, ch. 6, § 1; 2011, ch. 13, § 1.

§ 9-12-407.
Sunset provision. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 73, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2011, ch. 13, § 1; repealed by 2020 ch. 87, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 9-12-408.
Wyoming research and innovation program fund created; authorized expenditures from the fund; rulemaking. [Renumbered]

History.

2018 ch. 127, § 1, effective March 14, 2018; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-12-1405

by 2019 ch. 186, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 9-12-409.
Startup-Wyoming investments. [Renumbered]

History.

2018 ch. 127, § 1, effective March 14, 2018; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-12-114

by 2019 ch. 186, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.